Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-509
Museums; board; report; contents.

Except where a contract is entered into for the use of a museum already established, the museum board shall, on or before the second Monday in June in each year, make a report to the city council, village board, or to the county or township board as to the condition of its trust on June 1 of such year, showing all money received or expended and a general report on all its activities in the operation and supervision of the museum and any information and suggestions it may deem of general interest, or as the city council, village, county, or township board may require. The report shall be in writing and verified by affidavit of the proper officers of such board.

Laws 1957, c. 224, § 9, p. 770;

Laws 1989, LB 444, § 3.

Holding that the county had an interest in result of pending litigation and had standing to intervene on the question as to whether proceeds from a tax levy could be used to pay for construction costs based in part on this section. Geer-Melkus Constr. Co., Inc. v. Hall County Museum Board, 186 Neb. 615, 185 N.W.2d 671 (1971).